California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) The person may file the petition after a period of not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the surrender of the certificate or the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least five years for reinstatement of a license surrendered or revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the board may, for good cause
 shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after three years.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation or after more than one-half of the probation term has elapsed, whichever is greater.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license surrendered or revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(c) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from physicians and surgeons licensed in any state who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(d) The petition
 may be heard by a panel of the board. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, as applicable, which shall be acted upon in accordance with Section 2335.

(e) The panel of the board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the certificate was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.

(f) The administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code reinstating a certificate or modifying a penalty may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.

(g) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person. The board shall automatically reject a petition for early termination or modification of probation if the board files a petition to revoke probation while the petition for early termination or modification of the probation is pending. The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of three years from the
 effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(h) This section is applicable to and may be carried out with regard to licensees of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine. In lieu of two verified recommendations from physicians and surgeons, the petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from doctors of podiatric medicine licensed in any state who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the date the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(i) (1) The board shall not reinstate the certificate of a person under any of the following circumstances:

(A) The person’s certificate has been surrendered because the person committed an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or
 sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.

(B) The person’s certificate has been revoked based on a finding by the board that the person committed an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.

(C) The person was convicted in a court in or outside of this state of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, based on the elements of the convicted offense, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, and the person engaged in the offense with a patient or client, or with a former patient or client if the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of committing the offense.

(D) The person
 has been required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of Section 290 of the Penal Code, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed, and the person engaged in the offense with a patient or client, or with a former patient or client if the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of committing the offense.

(2) A plea or a verdict of guilty or a conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to an applicant who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(j) Nothing
 in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 20.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2307.5.

(a) The board may establish a fee to be paid by a person seeking a license reinstatement or modification of penalty pursuant to Section 2307.

(b) The fee established shall not exceed the board’s reasonable costs to process and adjudicate a petition submitted pursuant to Section 2307.

(c) The board shall adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 21.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2310.

(a) If a physician and surgeon possesses a license or is otherwise authorized to practice medicine (1) in any state other than California or (2) by any agency of the federal government and that license or authority is suspended or revoked outright and is reported to the National Practitioners Data Bank, the physician and surgeon’s certificate shall be suspended automatically for the duration of the suspension or revocation, unless terminated or rescinded as provided in subdivision (c). The division shall notify the physician and surgeon of the
 license suspension and of his or her right to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in this section.

(b) Upon its own motion or for good cause shown, the division may decline to impose or may set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of and confidence in the medical profession.

(c) The issue of penalty shall be heard by an administrative law judge from the Medical Quality Panel sitting alone or with a panel of the division, in the discretion of the division. A physician and surgeon may request a hearing on the penalty and that hearing shall be held within 90 days from the date of the request. If the order suspending or revoking the physician and surgeon’s license or authority to practice medicine is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically
 cease. Upon the showing to the administrative law judge or panel by the physician and surgeon that the out-of-state action is not a basis for discipline in California, the suspension shall be rescinded.

If an accusation for permanent discipline is not filed within 90 days of the suspension imposed pursuant to this section, the suspension shall automatically terminate.

(d) The record of the proceedings that resulted in the suspension or revocation of the physician and surgeon’s license or authority to practice medicine, including a transcript of the testimony therein, may be received in evidence.

(e) This section shall not apply to a physician and surgeon who maintains his or her primary practice in California, as evidenced by having maintained a practice in this state for not less than one year immediately preceding the date of suspension
 or revocation. Nothing in this section shall preclude a physician’s and surgeon’s license from being suspended pursuant to any other provision of law.

(f) This section shall not apply to a physician and surgeon whose license has been surrendered whose only discipline is a medical staff disciplinary action at a federal hospital not for medical disciplinary cause or reason as that term is defined in Section 805, or whose revocation or suspension has been stayed, even if the physician and surgeon remains subject to terms of probation or other discipline.

(g) This section shall not apply to a suspension or revocation imposed by a state that is based solely on the prior discipline of the physician and surgeon by another state.

(h) The other provisions of this article setting forth a procedure for the suspension or
 revocation of a physician and surgeon’s certificate shall not apply to summary suspensions issued pursuant to this section. If a summary suspension has been issued pursuant to this section, the physician or surgeon may request that the hearing on the penalty conducted pursuant to subdivision (c) be held at the same time as a hearing on the accusation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2311.

Whenever any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute or will constitute an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of the board or of 10 or more persons licensed as physicians and surgeons or as podiatrists in this state, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining the conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2312.

The Division of Medical Quality shall seek to obtain an injunction against any physician and surgeon within its jurisdiction if the division has reasonable cause to believe that allowing such person to continue to engage in the practice of medicine would endanger the public health, safety, or welfare.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2313.

The board shall report annually to the Legislature, no later than October 1 of each year, the following information:

(a) The total number of temporary restraining orders or interim suspension orders sought by the board to enjoin licensees pursuant to Sections 125.7, 125.8, and 2311, the circumstances in each case that prompted the board to seek that injunctive
 relief, and whether a restraining order or interim suspension order was actually issued.

(b) The total number and types of actions for unprofessional conduct taken by the board against licensees, the number and types of actions taken against licensees for unprofessional conduct related to prescribing drugs, narcotics, or other controlled substances, including those related to the undertreatment or undermedication of pain.

(c) Information relative to the performance of the board, including the following: number of consumer calls received; number of consumer calls or letters designated as discipline-related complaints; number of complaint forms received; number of Section 805 and Section 805.01 reports by type; number of Section 801.01 and Section 803 reports; coroner reports received; number of convictions reported to the board; number of criminal filings reported to the division;
 number of complaints and referrals closed, referred out, or resolved without discipline, respectively, prior to accusation; number of accusations filed and final disposition of accusations through the board and court review, respectively; final physician discipline by category; number of citations issued with fines and without fines, and number of public reprimands issued; number of cases in process more than six months from receipt by the board of information concerning the relevant acts to the filing of an accusation; average and median time in processing complaints from original receipt of complaint by the board for all cases at each stage of discipline and court review, respectively; number of persons in diversion, and number successfully completing diversion programs and failing to do so, respectively; probation violation reports and probation revocation filings and dispositions; number of petitions for reinstatement and their dispositions; and caseloads of investigators for original cases and for
 probation cases, respectively.

“Action,” for purposes of this section, includes proceedings brought by, or on behalf of, the board against licensees for unprofessional conduct that have not been finally adjudicated, as well as disciplinary actions taken against licensees.

(d) The total number of reports received pursuant to Sections 805 and 805.01 by the type of peer review body reporting and, where applicable, the type of health care facility involved and the total number and type of administrative or disciplinary actions taken by the board with respect to the reports.

(e) The number of malpractice settlements in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) reported pursuant to Section 801.01. This information shall be grouped by specialty practice and shall include the total number of physicians and surgeons practicing in each specialty.
 For the purpose of this subdivision, “specialty” includes all specialties and subspecialties considered in determining the risk categories described in Section 803.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2314.

(a) Unless it is otherwise expressly provided, any person, whether licensed under this chapter or not, who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

(b) A person, whether licensed under this chapter or not, who violates Section 2273 is punishable pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2315.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2315.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person found guilty of a misdemeanor for a violation of this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) or by imprisonment for a term of not less than 60 days nor more than 180 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(b) A violation of Section 2273 is a public offense and is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year. A second or subsequent conviction is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 12.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2316.

If a licensed physician and surgeon who provides expertise to the board in the evaluation of an applicant or a licensee is, as a result of providing that expertise, the subject of a disciplinary proceeding undertaken by a specialty board of which the physician and surgeon is a member, with board approval, the Office of the Attorney General shall represent the physician and surgeon in that disciplinary proceeding regarding any allegation brought against the physician and surgeon as a direct
 result of providing that expertise to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   (AB 1767)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2317.

If a person, not a regular employee of the board, is hired, under contract, or retained under any other arrangement, paid or unpaid, to provide expertise or nonexpert testimony to the Medical Board of California or to the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, including, but not limited to, the evaluation of the conduct of an applicant or a licensee, and that person is named as a defendant in an action for defamation, malicious prosecution, or any other civil cause of action directly resulting from opinions rendered, statements made, or testimony given to, or on
 behalf of, the committee or its representatives, the board shall provide for representation required to defend the defendant in that civil action. The board shall be liable for any judgment rendered against that person, except that the board shall not be liable for any punitive damages award. If the plaintiff prevails in a claim for punitive damages, the defendant shall be liable to the board for the full costs incurred in providing representation to the defendant. The Attorney General shall be utilized in those actions as provided in Section 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2318.

In addition to any immunity afforded by Sections 43.8 and 47 of the Civil Code, if applicable, any person, including, but not limited to, a physician and surgeon, hospital, health facility as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, nursing home, convalescent home, peer review body as defined in Section 805, medical society, professional association, patient, nurse, or other healing arts licensee who provides information to the board, to the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or to the Department of Justice indicating that a board licensee may be guilty of unprofessional conduct or may be impaired because of drug or alcohol abuse or mental
 illness, shall not be liable for any damages in any civil action on account of the communication of that information to the board. The immunities afforded by this section shall not affect the availability of any absolute privilege which may be afforded by Section 47 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1597, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

2319.

(a) The board shall set as a goal the improvement of its disciplinary system by January 1, 1992, so that an average of no more than six months will elapse from the receipt of complaint to the completion of an investigation.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the goal for cases which, in the opinion of the board, involve complex medical or fraud issues or complex business or financial arrangements should be no more than one year to investigate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1597, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Medical Adjudication [2330. - 2337.]

2330.

Complainants against licensees of the board, including licensees of allied health boards within the jurisdiction of the board, and of the Board of Podiatric Medicine, who are subject to formal disciplinary proceedings shall be notified of the actions proposed to be taken against the licensee. This notification shall be provided only to complainants who are known to the boards.

Complainants shall be given an opportunity to provide a statement to the deputy attorney general from the Health Quality Enforcement Section who is assigned the case. These statements shall not be considered by a panel of the division, the Board of Podiatric Medicine, or other board for purposes of adjudicating the case to which the statement pertains, but may be considered by the division or those boards after the case is finally adjudicated for purposes of setting generally applicable policies and standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2332.

(a) The Division of Medical Quality or the Health Quality Enforcement Section of the office of the Attorney General may establish panels or lists of experts as necessary to assist them in their respective duties. When the Division of Medical Quality or the Health Quality Enforcement Section seeks expert assistance or witnesses, and the use of voluntary services is impractical, they may retain experts to assist them, and to prepare and present testimony as appropriate, at prevailing market rates. The board shall establish policies and procedures for the selection and use of those experts.

(b) The Division of Medical Quality may also adopt regulations to create a system of volunteer physicians and others in committees or panels to assist the board in any of the following functions:

(1) Monitoring of licensees who have been disciplined and are subject to terms and conditions of probation or diversion.

(2) Evaluation and administration of competency examinations.

(3) Assistance to practitioners with special problems.

(4) Supervision of licensees with practice restrictions.

(5) Advice regarding policy options and preventive strategies.

(c) Commencing January 1, 1994, any reference to a medical quality review committee shall be deemed a reference to a panel of the Division of Medical Quality.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2334.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with respect to the use of expert testimony in matters brought by the Medical Board of California, no expert testimony shall be permitted by any party unless the following information is exchanged in written form with counsel for the other party, as ordered by the Office of Administrative Hearings:

(1) A curriculum vitae setting forth the qualifications of the expert.

(2) A complete expert witness report, which must include the following:

(A) A complete statement of all opinions the expert will express and the bases and reasons for each opinion.

(B) The facts or data considered by the expert in forming the opinions.

(C) Any exhibits that will be used to summarize or support the opinions.

(3) A representation that the expert has agreed to testify at the hearing.

(4) A statement of the expert’s hourly and daily fee for providing testimony and for consulting with the party who retained their services.

(5) A statement, if any, provided pursuant to Section 2220.2.

(b) The exchange of the information described in subdivision (a) shall be completed no later than 90 calendar days prior to the originally scheduled commencement date of the hearing, or as determined by an
 administrative law judge when Section 11529 of the Government Code applies. Upon motion to extend the deadline based on a showing of good cause, the administrative law judge may extend the time for the exchange of information for a period not to exceed 100 calendar days cumulatively, but in no case shall the exchange take place less than 30 calendar days before the hearing date, whichever comes first.

(c) The Office of Administrative Hearings may adopt regulations governing the required exchange of the information described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 22.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2335.

(a) All proposed decisions and interim orders of the Medical Quality Hearing Panel designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code shall be transmitted to the executive director of the board, or the executive director of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine as to the licensees of that board, within 48 hours of filing.

(b) All interim orders shall be final when filed.

(c) A proposed decision shall be acted upon by the board or by any panel appointed pursuant to Section 2008 or by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, as the case may be, in accordance with Section 11517 of the Government Code, except that all of the following shall apply to
 proceedings against licensees under this chapter:

(1) When considering a proposed decision, the board or panel and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall give great weight to the findings of fact of the administrative law judge, except to the extent those findings of fact are controverted by new evidence.

(2) The board’s staff or the staff of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall poll the members of the board or panel or of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine by written mail ballot concerning the proposed decision. The mail ballot shall be sent within 10 calendar days of receipt of the proposed decision, and shall poll each member on whether the member votes to approve the decision, to approve the decision with an altered penalty, to refer the case back to the administrative law judge for the taking of additional evidence, to defer final decision
 pending discussion of the case by the panel or board as a whole, or to nonadopt the decision. No party to the proceeding, including employees of the agency that filed the accusation, and no person who has a direct or indirect interest in the outcome of the proceeding or who presided at a previous stage of the decision, may communicate directly or indirectly, upon the merits of a contested matter while the proceeding is pending, with any member of the panel or board, without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication. The votes of a majority of the board or of the panel, and a majority of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, are required to approve the decision with an altered penalty, to refer the case back to the administrative law judge for the taking of further evidence, or to nonadopt the decision. The votes of two members of the panel or board are required to defer final decision pending discussion of the case by the panel or board as a whole; except that, in the
 case of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the vote of only one member of that board is required to defer final decision pending discussion of the case by the board as a whole. If there is a vote by the specified number to defer final decision pending discussion of the case by the panel or board as a whole, provision shall be made for that discussion before the 100-day period specified in paragraph (3) expires, but in no event shall that 100-day period be extended.

(3) If a majority of the board or of the panel, or a majority of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine vote to do so, the board or the panel or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall issue an order of nonadoption of a proposed decision within 100 calendar days of the date it is received by the board. If the board or the panel or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine does not refer the case back to the administrative law judge for the taking of additional
 evidence or issue an order of nonadoption within 100 calendar days, the decision shall be final and subject to review under Section 2337. Members of the board or of any panel or of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine who review a proposed decision or other matter and vote by mail as provided in paragraph (2) shall return their votes by mail to the board within 30 days from receipt of the proposed decision or other matter.

(4) The board or the panel or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall afford the parties the opportunity to present oral argument before deciding a case after nonadoption of the administrative law judge’s decision.

(5) A vote of a majority of the board or of a panel, or a majority of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, are required to increase the penalty from that contained in the proposed administrative law judge’s decision. No member of
 the board or panel or of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine may vote to increase the penalty except after reading the entire record and personally hearing any additional oral argument and evidence presented to the panel or board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 11.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2336.

The Division of Medical Quality and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall adopt rules, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to govern the conduct of oral argument following nonadoption of a proposed decision. These rules shall preclude oral argument that exceeds the scope of the record of duly admitted evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 708, Sec. 10.3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2337.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, superior court review of a decision revoking, suspending, or restricting a license shall take preference over all other civil actions in the matter of setting the case for hearing or trial. The hearing or trial shall be set no later than 180 days from the filing of the action. Further continuance shall be granted only on a showing of good cause.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, review of the superior court’s decision shall be pursuant to a petition for an extraordinary writ.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1206, Sec. 22) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 708, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Physician and Surgeon Health and Wellness Program [2340. - 2340.8.]

2340.

(a) The board may establish a Physician and Surgeon Health and Wellness Program for the early identification of, and appropriate interventions to support a physician and surgeon in his or her rehabilitation from, substance abuse to ensure that the physician and surgeon remains able to practice medicine in a manner that will not endanger the public health and safety and that will maintain the integrity of the medical profession. The program, if established, shall aid a physician and surgeon with substance abuse issues impacting his or her ability to practice medicine.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “program” shall mean the Physician and Surgeon Health and Wellness
 Program.

(c) If the board establishes a program, the program shall meet the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2340.2.

If the board establishes a program, the program shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide for the education of all licensed physicians and surgeons with respect to the recognition and prevention of physical, emotional, and psychological problems.

(b) Offer assistance to a physician and surgeon in identifying substance abuse problems.

(c) Evaluate the extent of substance abuse problems and refer the physician and surgeon to the appropriate treatment by executing a written agreement with a physician and surgeon participant.

(d) Provide for the confidential participation by a physician and surgeon with substance abuse issues who does not have a restriction on his or her practice related to those substance abuse issues. If an investigation of a physician and surgeon occurs after the physician and surgeon has enrolled in the program, the board may inquire of the program whether the physician and surgeon is enrolled in the program and the program shall respond accordingly.

(e) Comply with the Uniform Standards Regarding Substance-Abusing Healing Arts Licensees as adopted by the Substance Abuse Coordination Committee of the department pursuant to
 Section 315.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2340.4.

(a) If the board establishes a program, the board shall contract for the program’s administration with a private third-party independent administering entity pursuant to a request for proposals. The process for procuring the services for the program shall be administered by the board pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. However, Section 10425 of the Public Contract Code shall not apply to this subdivision.

(b) The administering entity shall have expertise and experience in the areas of substance or alcohol abuse in healing arts professionals.

(c) The administering entity shall identify and use a statewide treatment resource network that includes treatment and screening programs and support groups and shall establish a process for evaluating the effectiveness of those programs.

(d) The administering entity shall provide counseling and support for the physician and surgeon and for the family of any physician and surgeon referred for treatment.

(e) The administering entity shall make their services available to all licensed California physicians and surgeons, including those who self-refer to the program.

(f) The administering entity shall have a system for immediately reporting a physician and surgeon, including, but not limited to, a physician and
 surgeon who withdraws or is terminated from the program, to the board. This system shall ensure absolute confidentiality in the communication to the board. The administering entity shall not provide this information to any other
 individual or entity unless authorized by the participating physician and surgeon or this article.

(g) The contract entered into pursuant to this section shall also require the administering entity to do the following:

(1) Provide regular communication to the board, including annual reports to the board with program statistics, including, but not limited to, the number of participants currently in the program, the number of participants referred by the board as a condition of probation, the number of participants who have successfully completed their agreement period, and the number of participants terminated from the program. In making reports, the administering entity shall not disclose any personally identifiable information relating to any participant.

(2) Submit to periodic audits and inspections of all operations, records, and management related to the program to ensure compliance with the requirements of this article and its implementing rules and regulations. Any audit conducted pursuant to this section shall maintain the confidentiality of all records reviewed and information obtained in the course of conducting the audit and shall not disclose any information identifying a program participant.

(h) If the board determines the administering entity is not in compliance with the requirements of the program or contract entered into with
 the board, the board may terminate the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2340.6.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall, as a condition of participation in the program, enter into an individual agreement with the program and agree to pay expenses related to treatment, monitoring, laboratory tests, and other activities specified in the participant’s written agreement. The agreement shall include all of the following:

(1) A jointly agreed-upon plan and mandatory conditions and procedures to monitor compliance with the program.

(2) Compliance with terms and conditions of treatment and monitoring.

(3) Criteria for program
 completion.

(4) Criteria for termination of a physician and surgeon participant from the program.

(5) Acknowledgment that withdrawal or termination of a physician and surgeon participant from the program shall be reported to the board.

(6) Acknowledgment that expenses related to treatment, monitoring, laboratory tests, and other activities specified by the program shall be paid by the physician and surgeon participant.

(b) Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall not be considered a disciplinary action or order by the board and shall not be disclosed to the board if both of the following apply:

(1) The physician and surgeon did not enroll in the program as a condition of probation or as a result of an action by the board.

(2) The physician and surgeon is in compliance with the conditions and procedures in the agreement.

(c) Any oral or written information reported to the board shall remain confidential and shall not constitute a waiver of any existing evidentiary privileges. However, confidentiality regarding the physician and surgeon’s participation in the program and related records shall not apply if the board has referred a participant as a
 condition of probation or as otherwise authorized by this article.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits, requires, or otherwise affects the discovery or admissibility of evidence in an action by the board against a physician and surgeon based on acts or omissions that are alleged to be grounds for discipline.

(e) Participation in the program shall not be a defense to any disciplinary action that may be taken by the board. This section does not preclude the board from commencing disciplinary action against
 a physician and surgeon who is terminated unsuccessfully from the program. However, that disciplinary action shall not include as evidence any confidential information unless authorized by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2340.8.

(a) The Physician and Surgeon Health and Wellness Program Account is hereby established within the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California. Any fees collected by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deposited in the Physician and Surgeon Health and Wellness Program Account and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the support of the program.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations to determine the appropriate fee that a physician and surgeon participating in the program shall provide to the board. The fee amount adopted by the board shall be set at a level sufficient to cover all costs for participating in the
 program, including any administrative costs incurred by the board to administer the program.

(c) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the board may use moneys from the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California to support the initial costs for the board to establish the program under this article, except these moneys shall not be used to cover any costs for individual physician and surgeon participation in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Osteopathic Physician and Surgeon Diversion Evaluation Committee [2360. - 2370.]

2360.
